Wisconsin, session 2025, SB280.
do enact as follows:SB280,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB280,2,34(1) Interest earned on coronavirus state and local fiscal recovery 1funds. On the effective date of this subsection, in accordance with s. 20.906 (1), 2$172,000,000 in the appropriation to the department of administration under s. 320.505 (1) (mb) lapses to the general fund.SB280,2,44